Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2313
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Interstate Trust Company Office Act shall be construed to authorize any Nebraska trust company or any out-of-state trust company to conduct the general business of banking at any branch trust office or representative trust office.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 66.